California, session 20252026, AB1687.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as Irene’s Law.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 13351 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:13351. (a) The department immediately shall revoke the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of any of the following crimes or offenses:(1) Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, except when convicted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.(2) Conviction of three or more violations of Section 20001, 20002, 23103, 23104, or 23105 within a period of 12 months from the time of the first offense to the third or subsequent offense, or a combination of three or more convictions of violations within the same period.(3) Violation of subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code or of Section 2800.3 causing serious bodily injury resulting in a serious impairment of physical condition, including, but not limited to, loss of consciousness, concussion, serious bone fracture, protracted loss or impairment of function of any bodily member or organ, and serious disfigurement.(b) The department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under subdivision (a) until the expiration of three years after the date of revocation and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.(c) (1) If a person is convicted of three or more violations of subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code or of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546, 23550, or 23550.5, or Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5 or 23566, including a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code as provided in Section 193.7 of that code, or of a combination of three or more violations of these provisions, and each of the three or more violations occurred within a 10-year period, the department may revoke the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle subject to the same procedural requirements described in subdivision (a). If the department revokes the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to this paragraph, the department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under this subdivision until the expiration of eight years after the date of revocation and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) Four years from the date of the last conviction of a violation of an offense described in paragraph (1), a person whose license was revoked pursuant to paragraph (1) may apply to the department to have the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle reinstated, subject to the conditions that the person submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386 and agrees to install and maintain an ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (g) of Section 23575. Notwithstanding Article 5 (commencing with Section 23573) of Chapter 2 of Division 11.5, the ignition interlock device shall remain on the person’s motor vehicle for two years following the reinstatement of the person’s driving privilege pursuant to this subdivision.(3) The department shall reinstate the person’s license pursuant to paragraph (2) if the person satisfies all of the following conditions:(A) The person was not convicted of any drug- or alcohol-related offenses, under state law, during the driver’s license revocation period.(B) The person successfully completed a driving-under-the-influence program, licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, following the date of the last conviction of a violation of an offense described in paragraph (1), if such a program is required.(C) The person was not convicted of violating Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.4, or 14601.5 during the driver’s license revocation period.(4) The department shall immediately terminate the restrictions issued pursuant to paragraph (2) and shall immediately revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle of a person who attempts to remove, bypass, or tamper with the device, who has the device removed prior to the termination date of the restriction, or who fails three or more times to comply with any requirement for the maintenance or calibration of the ignition interlock device. The privilege shall remain revoked for the remaining period of the original revocation and until all reinstatement requirements are met.